Alabama, session 2026rs, HB94.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
61 Section 1. Sections 36-16-1, 36-16-3, 36-16-6, and
62 Section 36-16-8, as last amended by Act 2025-70 of the 2025
63 Regular Session, Section 36-16-10, and Section 36-16-11, as
64 last amended by Act 2025-68 of the 2025 Regular Session, Code
65 of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
66 "§36-16-1
67 (a) The sole powers, functions and duties of the State
68 Auditor shall be as followsinclude all of the following:
69 (1) Those enumerated in the constitution;.
70 (2) The keeping of To keep a seal with the devise, "The
71 State of Alabama, Auditor's Office;."
72 (3) If the Treasurer, in the event of his resignation
73 or removal, fails to comply with the provisions of this code,
74 or if he dies or absconds, the stating of his account in the
75 presence of any person attending on the part of such late
76 Treasurer and the delivering of the books, papers and moneys
77 belonging to the Treasury to his successor, taking his receipt
78 for the same, and recording and filing such receipts and
79 statement and reporting the same to the next Legislature;
80 (4) The postauditing of the accounts and records of the
81 Department of Finance and the Treasurer;
82 (5)(3) The serving To serve on the boards and
83 commissions of which he or she is by law an ex officio member;
84 and.
Page 3

and.
HB94 INTRODUCED
85 (6) The making of a full and complete report to the
86 Governor at the close of each fiscal year showing the audited
87 receipts and disbursements of the government for the last
88 completed fiscal year, as required by the constitution and as
89 shown by the records and documents in the office of the
90 Department of Finance, which records shall be audited by him.
91 The report shall also include the results of his audit of all
92 taxes and revenues collected and paid into the Treasury and
93 shall give the results of all other audits made by him. The
94 report shall be printed and bound with, and as a part of, the
95 annual financial report of the state prepared by the
96 Department of Finance. The Auditor shall make reports oftener
97 upon, and matters pertaining to, his office if required by the
98 Governor or the Legislature.
99 (b) In the event the State Auditor resigns, is removed
100 from office, dies in office, or fails to comply with this
101 chapter, the successor to the State Auditor shall submit a
102 detailed report regarding the transfer of duties to the
103 successor during the next legislative session following the
104 transfer.
105 (c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Office
106 of the State Auditor may do any of the following:
107 (1) Not more frequently than once every four calendar
108 years, beginning October 1, 2026, adjust the threshold value
109 of state property that must be inventoried pursuant to this
110 chapter to reflect the cumulative change in the Consumer Price
111 Index, as published by the United States Department of Labor,
112 rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The State
Page 4

rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The State
HB94 INTRODUCED
113 Auditor shall notify property managers described in Section
114 36-16-8 of the adjusted threshold value at least 90 days prior
115 to the effective date of the adjusted threshold value, and the
116 adjusted threshold values shall apply only to property
117 acquired after that effective date. Notwithstanding the
118 foregoing, property managers, upon written request from the
119 head of the department or agency and approval by the State
120 Auditor, may make a complete inventory of all used and
121 acquired property reflecting the adjusted threshold value if
122 doing so is determined to be in the best interest of the
123 department or agency.
124 (2) Investigate loss or damage to state property as
125 further provided in Section 36-16-1.1."
126 "§36-16-3
127 The State Auditor may employ a chief clerkchief of
128 staff, whose employment shall be at the pleasure of the State
129 Auditor. Subject to the provisions of the state Merit System,
130 he the chief of staff may employ principal accountants,
131 account clerks, and senior stenographersother clerical staff."
132 "§36-16-6
133 The official acts of the chief clerk chief of staff
134 shall be presumed to be by the authority of, and shall be
135 taken as done by, the State Auditor, who shall be responsible
136 for the same."
137 "§36-16-8
138 (a) As used in this section, "threshold value" means a
139 value of five hundred dollars ($500) or the threshold amount
140 adjusted by the State Auditor pursuant to Section
Page 5

adjusted by the State Auditor pursuant to Section
HB94 INTRODUCED
141 36-16-1(c)(1).
142 (b) The Property Inventory Control Division shall
143 establish a control in the following manner of all
144 nonconsumable state personal property not exempt under Section
145 36-16-11.:
146 (1) The head of each department or agency of the state
147 shall designate one of its employees as property manager for
148 the department or agency. Except for books, the property
149 manager shall make a full and complete inventory of all
150 nonconsumable personal property and certain other items of
151 personal property deemed sufficiently important or sensitive
152 enough by the Property Inventory Control Division to be
153 included in the inventory of state property of the value of
154 five hundred dollars ($500) or more that meets or exceeds the
155 threshold value owned by the state and used or acquired by the
156 department or agency. The inventory shall show the complete
157 description, manufacturer's serial number, cost price, date of
158 purchase, location, and custodial agency, responsible officer,
159 or employee, and the state property control marking. A copy of
160 the inventory shall be submitted to the Property Inventory
161 Control Division on October 1 and April 1 of each year for
162 small agencies with read-only access to the electronic
163 reporting system used by the Office of the State Auditor. Each
164 inventory shall show all property acquired since the date of
165 the last inventory. When any inventory fails to show any
166 property shown on the previous inventory, then a complete
167 explanation accounting for the property or the disposition
168 thereof shall be attached to the inventory and submitted to
Page 6

thereof shall be attached to the inventory and submitted to
HB94 INTRODUCED
169 the Property Inventory Control Division. All property managers
170 shall keep at all times in their files a copy of all
171 inventories submitted to the Property Inventory Control
172 Division, and the copies shall be subject to examination by
173 any and all state auditors or employees of the Department of
174 Examiners of Public Accounts.
175 (2) Each property manager shall be the custodian of,
176 and responsible for, all property in his or her department or
177 agency. When any property is entrusted to other employees or
178 officers of the department or agency, the property manager
179 shall require a written receipt of the property so entrusted,
180 which. The receipt shall be executed signed by the person
181 individual receiving the property. In that event, the property
182 manager shall be relieved of responsibility of the property,
183 and the employee or officer of the department or agency shall
184 be responsible for the property.
185 (3) No property, except property being transferred to
186 the Department of Archives and History under Section 41-6-10,
187 shall be disposed of, transferred, assigned, or entrusted to
188 any other department, agency, or employee thereof without the
189 written permission of the any of the following or his or her
190 designee:
191 a. The Director of the Surplus Property Division of the
192 Alabama Department of Economic and Community Affairs or the.
193 b. The Governor of the State of Alabama or the designee
194 of either of them.
195 c. The Chief of the Property Inventory Control Division
196 of the Office of the State Auditor.
Page 7

of the Office of the State Auditor.
HB94 INTRODUCED
197 (4)a. Each property manager shall report to the Office
198 of the State Auditor, on a form and in a manner prescribed by
199 the State Auditor, the loss or theft of any property required
200 to be inventoried pursuant to this section not more than 30
201 days after the property manager learns of the loss or theft.
202 b. The Property Inventory Control Division shall report
203 the loss or theft to the Division of Property Investigations,
204 in a manner prescribed by the State Auditor, and provide a
205 brief summary detailing the circumstances surrounding the
206 loss, regardless of whether the loss or theft was marked
207 "non-negligent."
208 (4)(5)a. Biannually, Every two years, the Property
209 Inventory Control Division shall conduct an inventory of all
210 such state personal property, excluding: (i) historical
211 materials in the custody of the Department of Archives and
212 History, holding every officer or employee strictly
213 accountable for all personal property assigned to his or her
214 custody; and (ii) property located behind security bars at any
215 Department of Corrections and Department of Youth Services
216 facility subject to paragraph b.
217 b. The State Auditor shall permit an alternative audit
218 method in all areas located behind security bars at Department
219 of Corrections and Department of Youth Services facilities.
220 All state property located within a Department of Corrections
221 or Department of Youth Services facility that is not located
222 behind bars shall be audited according to normal processes.
223 (5)(6) No later than November 30 of each new fiscal
224 year, the State Auditor shall report in writing to the
Page 8

year, the State Auditor shall report in writing to the
HB94 INTRODUCED
225 Governor all losses and missing items of state property valued
226 at more than five hundred dollars ($500) that meet or exceed
227 the threshold value as revealed by the most recent inventory
228 of state personal property. No later than November 30 of each
229 fiscal year, the State Auditor shall publish on the website of
230 the Office of the State Auditor the Annual Production Report
231 and Losses Reports for the prior fiscal year. Quarterly Losses
232 Reports shall be published on the website within 30 days of
233 the close of each quarter.
234 (6)(7) Whenever any property manager ceases for any
235 reason to be the property manager of his or her department or
236 agency, the director of the department or agency, or the
237 supervisor of the property manager, shall immediately notify
238 in writing the Property Inventory Control Division. The
239 division shall immediately check the inventories of all
240 property assigned to the property manager in the department or
241 agency, and the successor to the property manager shall
242 execute a written receipt for all property received by him or
243 her or coming into his or her custody or control. The last
244 payment of salary due the property manager shall be withheld
245 until a complete check of the inventory of the property has
246 been made and approved. In the event of any shortages, the
247 property manager shall may be held strictly accountable based
248 on internal agency written procedures. Notwithstanding the
249 foregoing, the property manager shall not be held accountable
250 for property entrusted to any other employee or officer of the
251 department or agency and for which he or she holds the written
252 receipt of the employee or officer.
Page 9

receipt of the employee or officer.
HB94 INTRODUCED
253 (c) The State Auditor or, if delegated by the State
254 Auditor, the Chief of the Property Inventory Control Division,
255 may review and analyze the internal policies relating to
256 inventorying the state property of a state department, office,
257 bureau, board, or agency to ensure that state property is
258 being properly inventoried. Upon receiving a written request
259 from the State Auditor, a property manager shall submit the
260 internal policies to the State Auditor for review."
261 "§36-16-10
262 (a) The Chief of the Property Inventory Control
263 Division shall have the authority to carry out the provisions
264 of Sections 36-16-8 through 36-16-11, and shall require that
265 each department, office, bureau, board, or agency of the state
266 carry out fully the provisions of Sections 36-16-8 through
267 36-16-11 applicable to such the department, office, bureau,
268 board, or agency.
269 (b) In the event the Chief of the Property Inventory
270 Control Division neglects to perform the duties imposed upon
271 him or her by Sections 36-16-8 through 36-16-11, the State
272 Auditor shall report such neglect to the personnel board State
273 Personnel Board, which and the board shall administer such
274 disciplinary action against the chief of the division,
275 including the right to discharge him or her, as the board
276 deems proper under the circumstances.
277 (c) In the event the head of any department or officer
278 in charge of any office, bureau, board, or agency of the state
279 neglects to perform the duties imposed upon him or her by
280 Sections 36-16-8 through 36-16-11, he or she shall be liable
Page 10

Sections 36-16-8 through 36-16-11, he or she shall be liable
HB94 INTRODUCED
281 for the sum of $5.00 in the amount of five dollars ($5) for
282 each day suchthe neglect continues and for the value of any
283 and all personal property losses to the state as a result of
284 such the neglect."
285 "§36-16-11
286 There is hereby expressly All of the following are
287 exempt from Sections 36-16-8 to 36-16-10, inclusive, all
288 livestock, :
289 (1) Livestock, animals, and farm and agricultural
290 products.
291 (2) and property Property owned or used by, or in
292 connection with, or under the control of, all public schools,
293 universities, colleges, trade schools, Alabama Institute for
294 Deaf and Blind, State Library Service, and all any public
295 preK-12 school, state preK-12 school, two-year or four-year
296 public institution of higher education.
297 (3) Property owned or used by, or in connection with or
298 under the control of, the Alabama Institute for Deaf and Blind
299 and the State Library Service.
300 (4) Property owned or used by, or in connection with or
301 under the control of, any facility owned or operated by the
302 Department of Mental Health which provides mental health or
303 psychiatric care services.
304 (5) Any fire control or fire rescue equipment acquired
305 by the Alabama Forestry Commission from sources other than
306 state agencies and subsequently donated to volunteer fire
307 departments pursuant to Section 9-3-19; provided, Sections
308 36-16-8 to 36-16-10, inclusive, shall not apply to the Alabama
Page 11

36-16-8 to 36-16-10, inclusive, shall not apply to the Alabama
HB94 INTRODUCED
309 hospitals for the insane and the Partlow State School and
310 Hospital."
311 Section 2. Section 36-16-1.1 is added to the Code of
312 Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
313 §36-16-1.1
314 (a) For purposes of this section, the term "state
315 property" refers to any state property that meets or exceeds
316 the threshold value, as defined in Section 36-16-8.
317 (b) There is created within the Office of the State
318 Auditor the Division of Property Investigations which shall be
319 responsible for carrying out investigations described in this
320 section. The division may initiate an investigation upon a
321 request of the State Auditor, the Property Inventory Control
322 Division, or, upon receiving notice of acts of negligence in
323 the loss, theft, or damage of state property, whether through
324 its website or through another channel of communication.
325 (c)(1) The Division of Property Investigations may
326 investigate any instance of lost, stolen, or damaged state
327 property, including instances where the loss is marked as
328 "non-negligent" by the custodial agency. If in carrying out a
329 full investigation, including the procuring of evidence, the
330 division confirms that the loss, theft, or damage was not
331 negligent, the division shall issue a finding of
332 "non-negligence."
333 (2) If the division finds that the loss, theft, or
334 damage was caused by negligence or willful neglect, the State
335 Auditor may compel the offending public official or public
336 employee to pay the value of the lost, stolen, or damaged
Page 12

employee to pay the value of the lost, stolen, or damaged
HB94 INTRODUCED
337 property, and if such amount is not recovered, the State
338 Auditor shall certify the facts and amount due to the Attorney
339 General. The Attorney General may bring civil action in the
340 name of the state against the employee.
341 (d) Governmental entities, including any agency or
342 board of the state or political subdivision thereof that is
343 audited by the State Auditor, shall cooperate with and provide
344 assistance to the Division of Property Investigations by
345 providing necessary information to allow the division to carry
346 out its investigations in a timely manner.
347 (e) The Division of Property Investigations shall refer
348 to the Attorney General or the appropriate district attorney
349 any matter where there is a reasonable belief that a criminal
350 violation has occurred.
351 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
352 1, 2026.
Page 13